Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 4. Upper Colorado River Basin Compact

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).

For article, “Application of Park City Principles To Federal-State Conflicts,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 313 (1996).